Massachusetts, session 194th, S2486.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 6B of Chapter 115 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition 
is hereby amended by inserting, after the words “insurrection or combat, the following:- “or 
surviving spouse in receipt of Dependent Indemnity Compensation as awarded by the Veterans 
Administration”.